Ohio, session 136, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3902.65 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 3902.65. (A) As used in this section: 7
(1) "Prescription insulin drug" means a prescription drug 8
that contains insulin and is used to treat diabetes; 9
(2) "Diabetes device" means a blood glucose test strip, 10
continuous glucose monitor, lancet, lancing device, insulin 11
syringe, insulin pump, or other device used to cure, diagnose, 12
mitigate, prevent, or treat diabetes or low blood sugar, 13
regardless of whether a prescription is required to dispense the 14
device. 15
(3) "Diabetic ketoacidosis device" means a device that is 16

H. B. No. 263 Page 2
As Introduced
used to screen for or prevent diabetic ketoacidosis, regardless 17
of whether a prescription is required to dispense the device. 18
(B) Notwithstanding section 3901.71 of the Revised Code, 19
no health plan issuer that provides coverage for prescription 20
insulin drugs, diabetes devices, or diabetic ketoacidosis 21
devices pursuant to the terms of a health benefit plan amended, 22
issued, or renewed on or after the effective date of this 23
section shall require cost sharing in excess of either of the 24
following: 25
(1) Thirty-five dollars in aggregate for a thirty-day 26
supply of all covered prescription insulin drugs prescribed for 27
the covered person, regardless of the amount or type of insulin 28
needed to fill the covered person's prescription; 29
(2) One hundred dollars in aggregate for a thirty-day 30
supply of all covered diabetes devices or diabetic ketoacidosis 31
devices used by the covered person. 32
(C) The cost-sharing limitations prescribed by division 33
(B) of this section apply regardless of any deductible, 34
copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing requirement 35
that would otherwise apply to the covered person under the 36
health benefit plan. 37
(D) This section does not prohibit a health plan issuer 38
from reducing a covered person's cost-sharing requirement for 39
prescription insulin drugs, diabetes devices, or diabetic 40
ketoacidosis devices to amounts less than those prescribed by 41
division (B) of this section. 42